Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136A.1469] NOTICE OF TUITION REFUND DEADLINE DURING ADD-DROP PERIOD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Add-drop period" means the period of time at the beginning of an academic term where a student may choose to add or remove courses from the student's schedule, during which the institution will not mark the student as withdrawn from any removed course. new text end new text begin (c) "Deadline" means a designated date and time on an institution's academic calendar. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin (a) This section applies to the following postsecondary institutions: new text end new text begin (1) institutions governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities; and new text end new text begin (2) private postsecondary institutions that offer in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and are eligible institutions as defined in section 136A.103, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), that are participating in the federal program under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, Public Law 89-329, as amended. new text end new text begin (b) Institutions governed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota are requested to comply with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice of deadlines. new text end new text begin (a) A postsecondary institution must disclose the deadline for a student to receive a full tuition refund if a student chooses to drop a course during the add-drop period of a given academic term. new text end new text begin (b) The disclosure must be, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) placed in a conspicuous location in bold type on the institution's website; new text end new text begin (2) made through a direct written communication at the time of registration; and new text end new text begin (3) in the student handbook or academic catalog of the institution. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Internal complaints; appeal. new text end new text begin (a) A postsecondary institution must create a procedure for students to lodge a complaint alleging failure to comply with this section and for institutional review and investigation of lodged complaints. new text end new text begin (b) A student who believes an institution has violated the requirements of this section must first submit the student's complaint to the institution. A student may appeal an institutional finding of compliance by filing a complaint with the Office of Higher Education in the manner prescribed in section 136A.147. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [136A.147] ADD-DROP COMPLAINTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Authority. new text end new text begin The Office of Higher Education has the authority to review and take appropriate action on student complaints from schools covered under the provisions of section 136A.1469. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Complaint. new text end new text begin A complaint must be in writing, be signed by a student, and state how the school's policies and procedures or section 136A.1469 were violated. Student complaints shall be limited to complaints that occurred within six years from the date the concern should have been discovered with reasonable effort and after the student has utilized the school's internal complaint process. The office shall not investigate grade disputes, student conduct proceedings, disability accommodation requests, and discrimination claims, including Title IX complaints. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Investigation. new text end new text begin The office shall initiate an investigation upon receipt of a complaint within the authority of subdivision 2. A school involved in an investigation shall be informed of the alleged violations and the processes of the investigation. A school involved in an investigation shall respond to the alleged violations and provide requested documentation to the office. Upon completion of an investigation, the office shall inform the school and the student of the investigation outcome. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) If violations are found, the office may require remedial action by the school or assign a penalty under paragraph (b). Remedial action may include student notification of violations, adjustments to the school's policies and procedures, and tuition or fee refunds to impacted students. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may assess fines for violations of section 136A.1469. Each day's failure to comply with section 136A.1469 shall be a separate violation and fines shall not exceed $500 per day per violation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Appeals. new text end new text begin Any order requiring remedial action by the school or assigning a penalty under this section is appealable in accordance with chapter 14. The request for an appeal must be made in writing to the office within 30 days of the date the school is notified of the action of the office. The court shall award costs and reasonable attorney fees in a contested chapter 14 hearing to the office if: new text end new text begin (1) the office substantially prevails on the merits in an action brought under this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the school has a net income from student tuition, fees, and other required institutional charges collected from the last fiscal year of $1,000,000 or greater. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Disclosure. new text end new text begin Schools must disclose on their website, student handbook, and student catalog the student complaint process under this section to students. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Private information. new text end new text begin Student complaint data are private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. The office may disclose student complaint data to law enforcement officials or in connection with a legal or administrative proceeding commenced to enforce a requirement of law. new text end